Massachusetts, session 194th, H2239.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18 of chapter 17 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(c) The bureau shall establish a website that informs the public of acute treatment service
facilities and transitional support service facilities that have open beds. The bureau shall update
the website daily. The website shall provide the following information about each facility that
has an open bed: (i) the name, city or town, telephone number and website of the facility; (ii)
information about the types of payment that the facility accepts; and (iii) a description of the
types of programs and services provided at the facility. The website shall also provide
information about services available in each region of the commonwealth including, but not
limited to, alcohol and drug free housing as defined in section 18A, outpatient services and
of 2

community based services; provided, that each alcohol and drug free housing and service shall
list the city or town that they are located in and not their full address on their website.
SECTION 2. Subsection (f) of section 18A of said chapter 17, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following sentence:- Each alcohol and drug free housing listed by the
bureau shall list the city or town that they are located in and not their full address on their
website.
of 2